Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-1323.01
Employee; retirement; disability; medical examination; waiver.

(1) Any member who is an employee, disregarding the length of service, may be retired as a result of disability either upon the member's own application or upon the application of the member's employer or any person acting in the member's behalf. Before any member may be so retired, a medical examination shall be made at the expense of the retirement system, which examination shall be conducted by a disinterested physician legally authorized to practice medicine under the laws of the state in which he or she practices, such physician to be selected by the retirement board, and the physician shall certify to the board that the member suffers from an inability to engage in any substantially gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment which was initially diagnosed or became disabling while the member was an active participant in the plan and which can be expected to result in death or to be of long-continued and indefinite duration. The medical examination may be waived if, in the judgment of the retirement board, extraordinary circumstances exist which preclude substantial gainful activity by the member. Such circumstances shall include hospice placement or similar confinement for a terminal illness or injury. The application for disability retirement shall be made within one year of termination of employment.

(2) The retirement board may require any disability beneficiary who has not attained the age of fifty-five years to undergo a medical examination at the expense of the board once each year. If any disability beneficiary refuses to undergo such an examination, the disability retirement benefit may be discontinued by the board.

(3) The retirement board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and prescribe the necessary forms to carry out this section.

Laws 1973, LB 498, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 417, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 44;

Laws 1999, LB 703, § 25;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 29;

Laws 2010, LB950, § 27;

Laws 2017, LB415, § 50.